Hawaii statutes.
§806-50 Standing mute. If any person
being arraigned upon or charged with any offense, stands mute of malice, or
will not answer directly to the indictment, the court (if it shall so think
fit) may order the proper officer to enter a plea of "not guilty" on
behalf of that person, and the plea so entered shall have the same force and
effect as if the person had actually pleaded the same. [L 1876, c 40, §37; RL
1925, §4071; RL 1935, §5520; RL 1945, §10823; RL 1955, §258-33; HRS §711-50;
ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Pleas, see HRPP rule 11.

Case Notes

Proper for court to enter plea of not guilty. 9 H. 181, 187
(1893); 9 H. 641, 653 (1895); 13 H. 413, 419 (1901).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next